Idaho, session 2025, H0132.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 35, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-3508A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-3508A. DIETICIAN LICENSURE COMPACT. The interstate dietician li-
censure compact is enacted and entered into law with all other jurisdictions
joining in the compact in the form substantially as follows:
DIETICIAN LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 1
PURPOSE
The purpose of this compact is to facilitate interstate practice of
dietetics with the goal of improving public access to dietetics services.
This compact preserves the regulatory authority of states to protect public
health and safety through the current system of state licensure while also
providing for licensure portability through a compact privilege granted to
qualifying professionals.
This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to dietetics services;
B. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by licensed dieti-
tians who meet uniform requirements;
C. Eliminate the necessity for licenses in multiple states;
D. Reduce administrative burden on member states and licensees;
E. Enhance the states' ability to protect the public's health and
safety;
F. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate
practice of licensed dietitians;
G. Support relocating active military members and their spouses;
H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
information among member states; and
I. Vest all member states with the authority to hold a licensed dieti-
tian accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which
the patient is located at the time care is rendered.
SECTION 2


DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following
definitions shall apply:
A. "ACEND" means the accreditation council for education in nutrition
and dietetics or its successor organization.
B. "Active military member" means any individual with full-time duty
status in the active armed forces of the United States, including members of
the national guard and reserve.
C. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a state's laws that is imposed by a licensing
authority or other authority against a licensee, including actions against
an individual's license or compact privilege such as revocation, suspen-
sion, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's
practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a licensee's au-
thorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
D. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or prac-
tice remediation process approved by a licensing authority.
E. "CDR" means the commission on dietetic registration or its successor
organization.
F. "Charter member state" means any member state that enacted this com-
pact by law before the effective date specified in section 12 of this com-
pact.
G. "Compact commission" means the government agency whose membership
consists of all states that have enacted this compact, which is known as the
dietitian licensure compact commission, as described in section 8 of this
compact, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member states.
H. "Compact privilege" means a legal authorization, which is equiva-
lent to a license, permitting the practice of dietetics in a remote state.
I. "Continuing education" means a requirement, as a condition of li-
cense renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of,
educational and professional activities relevant to practice or area of
work.
J. "Current significant investigative information" means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing authority, after a pre-
liminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the
subject licensee to respond, if required by state law, has reason to be-
lieve is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a
minor infraction; or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the subject licensee
represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless
of whether the subject licensee has been notified and had an opportunity
to respond.
K. "Data system" means a repository of information about licensees,
including but not limited to continuing education, examination, licensure,
investigative, compact privilege, and adverse action information.
L. "Encumbered license" means a license in which an adverse action re-
stricts a licensee's ability to practice dietetics.


M. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation
on, a licensee's full and unrestricted practice of dietetics by a licensing
authority.
N. "Executive committee" means a group of delegates elected or ap-
pointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, this
compact and the compact commission.
O. "Home state" means the member state that is the licensee's primary
state of residence or that has been designated pursuant to section 6 of this
compact.
P. "Investigative information" means information, records, and docu-
ments received or generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an investi-
gation.
Q. "Jurisprudence requirement" means an assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the state laws and regulations governing the practice of di-
etetics in such state.
R. "License" means an authorization from a member state to either:
1. Engage in the practice of dietetics, including medical nutrition
therapy; or
2. Use the title "dietitian," "licensed dietitian," "licensed dieti-
tian nutritionist," or "certified dietitian" or another title describ-
ing a substantially similar practitioner as the compact commission may
further define by rule.
S. "Licensee" or "licensed dietitian" means an individual who cur-
rently holds a license and who meets all of the requirements outlined in
section 4 of this compact.
T. "Licensing authority" means the board or agency of a state, or equiv-
alent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of the practice
of dietetics.
U. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact.
V. "Practice of dietetics" means the synthesis and application of di-
etetics as defined by state law and regulations, primarily for the provision
of nutrition care services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person
or via telehealth, to prevent, manage, or treat diseases or medical condi-
tions and promote wellness.
W. "Registered dietitian" means a person who:
1. Has completed applicable education, experience, examination, and
recertification requirements approved by CDR;
2. Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered di-
etitian nutritionist; and
3. Is legally authorized to use the title "registered dietitian" or
"registered dietitian nutritionist" and the corresponding abbrevia-
tions "RD" or "RDN."
X. "Remote state" means a member state other than the home state, where
a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise a compact privilege.
Y. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the compact commission that
has the force of law.
Z. "Single state license" means a license issued by a member state
within the issuing state and does not include a compact privilege in any
other member state.


AA. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States of America.
BB. "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee
to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of dietetics.
SECTION 3
STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To participate in the compact, a state must currently:
1. License and regulate the practice of dietetics; and
2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
about licensees.
B. A member state shall:
1. Participate fully in the commission's data system, including using
the commission's unique identifier as defined by rule;
2. Notify the compact commission, in compliance with the terms of the
compact and rules, of any adverse action or the availability of current
significant investigative information regarding a licensee;
3. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal his-
tory record information of applicants for an initial compact privilege.
These procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other
biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtain-
ing an applicant's criminal history record information from the federal
bureau of investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that
state's criminal records;
a. A member state must fully implement a criminal history record
information requirement, within a time frame established by rule,
that includes receiving the results of the federal bureau of in-
vestigation record search and shall use those results in determin-
ing compact privilege eligibility.
b. Communication between a member state and the compact commis-
sion or among member states regarding the verification of eligi-
bility for a compact privilege shall not include any information
received from the federal bureau of investigation relating to a
federal criminal history record information check performed by a
member state.
4. Comply with and enforce the rules of the compact commission;
5. Require an applicant for a compact privilege to obtain or retain a
license in the licensee's home state and meet the home state's qualifi-
cations for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other ap-
plicable state laws; and
6. Recognize a compact privilege granted to a licensee who meets all
of the requirements outlined in section 4 of this compact in accordance
with the terms of the compact and rules.
C. Member states may set and collect a fee for granting a compact privi-
lege.
D. Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able
to apply for a member state's single state license as provided under the laws
of each member state. However, the single state license granted to these in-


dividuals shall not be recognized as granting a compact privilege to engage
in the practice of dietetics in any other member state.
E. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by
a member state for the issuance of a single state license.
F. At no point shall the compact commission have the power to define the
requirements for the issuance of a single state license to practice dietet-
ics. The member states shall retain sole jurisdiction over the provision of
these requirements.
SECTION 4
COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise the privilege to practice under the terms and provisions
of the compact, the licensee shall:
1. Satisfy one (1) of the following:
a. Hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the
right to use the term "registered dietitian"; or
b. Complete all of the following:
i. An education program that is either:
(a) A master's degree or doctoral degree that is pro-
grammatically accredited by (i) ACEND; or (ii) a di-
etetics accrediting agency recognized by the United
States department of education, which the compact com-
mission may by rule determine, and from a college or
university accredited at the time of graduation by the
appropriate regional accrediting agency recognized by
the council on higher education accreditation and the
United States department of education; or
(b) An academic degree from a college or university in
a foreign country equivalent to the degree described
in subparagraph b.i.(a) of this paragraph that is
programmatically accredited by ACEND or a dietetics
accrediting agency recognized by the United States de-
partment of education, which the compact commission
may by rule determine;
ii. A planned, documented, supervised practice experience
in dietetics that is programmatically accredited by (i)
ACEND; or (ii) a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by
the United States department of education, which the compact
commission may by rule determine and which involves at least
one thousand (1,000) hours of practice experience under the
supervision of a registered dietitian or a licensed dieti-
tian; and
iii. Either: (i) the registration examination for dieti-
tians administered by CDR; or (ii) a national credentialing
examination for dietitians approved by the compact commis-
sion by rule. Such completion may be no more than five (5)
years prior to the date of the licensee's application for
initial licensure and accompanied by a period of continuous


licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed
by the rules of the compact commission.
2. Hold an unencumbered license in the home state;
3. Notify the compact commission that the licensee is seeking a compact
privilege within a remote state;
4. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact
privilege;
5. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state
in which the licensee is seeking a compact privilege; and
6. Report to the compact commission any adverse action, encumbrance,
or restriction on a license taken by any non-member state within thirty
(30) days from the date the action is taken.
B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the home
state license. To maintain a compact privilege, renewal of the compact priv-
ilege shall be congruent with the renewal of the home state license as the
compact commission may define by rule. The licensee must comply with the re-
quirements of subsection A. of this section to maintain the compact privi-
lege in the remote state.
C. A licensee exercising a compact privilege shall adhere to the laws
and regulations of the remote state. Licensees shall be responsible for edu-
cating themselves on, and complying with, any and all state laws relating to
the practice of dietetics in such remote state.
D. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this compact or
state law, a licensee exercising a compact privilege shall not be required
to complete continuing education requirements required by a remote state. A
licensee exercising a compact privilege is only required to meet any contin-
uing education requirements as required by the home state.
SECTION 5
OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE BASED ON A COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. A licensee may hold a home state license, which allows for a compact
privilege in other member states, in only one (1) member state at a time.
B. If a licensee changes home state by moving between two (2) member
states:
1. The licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new home state
license based on a compact privilege, pay all applicable fees, and no-
tify the current and new home state in accordance with the rules of the
compact commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new home state license
by virtue of a compact privilege, the new home state shall verify that
the licensee meets the criteria in section 4 of this compact via the data
system and require that the licensee complete the following:
a. Federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based criminal
history record information check;
b. Any other criminal history record information required by the
new home state; and
c. Any jurisprudence requirements of the new home state.
3. The former home state shall convert the former home state license
into a compact privilege once the new home state has activated the new


home state license in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the
compact commission.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this compact, if the licensee
cannot meet the criteria in section 4 of this compact, the new home state
may apply its requirements for issuing a new single state license.
5. The licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new home state in
order to be issued a new home state license.
C. If a licensee changes state of residence by moving from a member
state to a non-member state, or from a non-member state to a member state, the
state criteria shall apply for issuance of a single state license in the new
state.
D. Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a licensee's ability to
hold a single state license in multiple states; however, for the purposes of
this compact, a licensee shall have only one (1) home state license.
E. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by
a member state for the issuance of a single state license.
SECTION 6
ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
An active military member, or the member's spouse, shall designate a
home state where the individual has a current license in good standing. The
individual may retain the home state designation during the period the ser-
vice member is on active duty.
SECTION 7
ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a remote
state shall have the authority, in accordance with existing state due
process law, to:
1. Take adverse action against a licensee's compact privilege within
that member state; and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of
evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a member state
for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of ev-
idence from another member state shall be enforced in the latter state
by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and
procedure applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before
that court. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of
the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
B. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action
against a licensee's home state license.
C. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall give the
same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a member state as
it would if the conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the
home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.


D. The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a li-
censee who changes home states during the course of the investigations. The
home state shall also have authority to take appropriate actions and shall
promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator
of the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly no-
tify the new home state of any adverse actions.
E. A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from
the affected licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases
resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee.
F. A member state may take adverse action based on the factual findings
of another remote state, provided that the member state follows its own pro-
cedures for taking the adverse action.
G. Joint investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its re-
spective state law, any member state may participate with other member
states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compli-
ance materials in furtherance of any joint investigation initiated un-
der the compact.
H. If adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee's
home state license resulting in an encumbrance on the home state license,
the licensee's compact privilege in all other member states shall be revoked
until all encumbrances have been removed from the home state license. All
home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a licensee
shall include a statement that the licensee's compact privileges are revoked
in all member states during the pendency of the order.
I. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to an unen-
cumbered license, as certified by the home state's licensing authority, the
licensee must meet the requirements of section 4A. of this compact and follow
the administrative requirements to reapply to obtain a compact privilege in
any remote state.
J. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the
administrator of the data system. The administrator of the data system shall
promptly notify the other member states of any adverse actions.
K. Nothing in this compact shall override a member state's decision
that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse
action.
SECTION 8
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint gov-
ernment agency whose membership consists of all member states that have
enacted the compact known as the dietitian licensure compact commission.
The compact commission is an instrumentality of the compact states acting
jointly and not an instrumentality of any one (1) state. The compact commis-
sion shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the compact
as set forth in section 12 of this compact.
B. Membership, voting, and meetings:


1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate se-
lected by that member state's licensing authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the licensing au-
thority or the administrator's designee.
3. The compact commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of of-
fice for delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The compact commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
5. A member state's licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its
delegate occurring on the compact commission within sixty (60) days of
the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters before
the compact commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
7. Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the by-
laws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet and vote in person
or by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of communica-
tion.
8. The compact commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The
compact commission may meet in person or by telecommunication, video
conference, or other means of communication.
C. The compact commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of
this compact, the compact commission's rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
compact commission, provided that the standing of any licensing author-
ity to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member
state as the authenticated business records of the compact commission
and designate an agent to do so on the compact commission's behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including but
not limited to employees of a member state;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define
duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the
purposes of the compact, and establish the compact commission's person-
nel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifica-
tions of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, services, and
gifts, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at
all times the compact commission shall avoid any actual or appearance of
impropriety or conflict of interest;


14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property,
real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or other-
wise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives,
and consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may
be designated in this compact or the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law en-
forcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a
vice chair;
21. Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially differ-
ent from the model compact language such that the state would not qual-
ify for participation in the compact; and
22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purposes of this compact.
D. The executive committee:
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
compact commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers,
duties, and responsibilities of the executive committee shall include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
compact, including enforcement and compliance with the provisions
of the compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties as
deemed necessary;
b. Recommend to the compact commission changes to the rules or by-
laws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to compact
member states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensure compact administration services are appropriately pro-
vided, including by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the compact commis-
sion;
f. Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide com-
pliance reports to the compact commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the compact commission dur-
ing the interim between compact commission meetings, except for
adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exer-
cising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the com-
pact commission by rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the compact
commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of nine (9) members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the compact commission shall be vot-
ing members of the executive committee;
b. Five (5) voting members from the current membership of the com-
pact commission, elected by the compact commission;


c. One (1) ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized profes-
sional association representing dietitians; and
d. One (1) ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized na-
tional credentialing organization for dietitians.
3. The compact commission may remove any member of the executive com-
mittee as provided in the compact commission's bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, ex-
cept that the executive committee may meet in a closed, non-public
meeting as provided in subsection F.2. of this section.
b. The executive committee shall give thirty (30) days' notice of
its meetings, posted on the website of the compact commission and
as determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the
business of the compact commission.
c. The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accor-
dance with subsection F.1.b. of this section.
E. The compact commission shall adopt and provide to the member states
an annual report.
F. Meetings of the compact commission:
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the compact
commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in para-
graph 2. of this subsection.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full compact commission
shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking
provisions in section 10 of this compact, except that the compact
commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subparagraph
b. of this paragraph.
b. The compact commission may hold a special meeting when it must
meet to conduct emergency business by giving twenty-four (24)
hours' notice to all member states, on the compact commission's
website, and other means as provided in the compact commission's
rules. The compact commission's legal counsel shall certify that
the compact commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
2. The compact commission or the executive committee or other commit-
tees of the compact commission may convene in a closed, non-public meet-
ing for the compact commission or executive committee or other commit-
tees of the compact commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the
compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters,
practices, or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the compact
commission or by a member state's licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of
goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any per-
son;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;


h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would con-
stitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by
or on behalf of or for use of the compact commission or other com-
mittee charged with responsibility of investigation or determina-
tion of compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or
member state law; or
l. Other matters as specified in the rules of the compact commis-
sion.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding offi-
cer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each rel-
evant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the
minutes.
4. The compact commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly de-
scribe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, includ-
ing a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All min-
utes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject
to release only by a majority vote of the compact commission or order of
a court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the compact commission:
1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reason-
able expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activi-
ties.
2. The compact commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
sources as provided in subsection C.13.
3. The compact commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
from each member state and impose fees on licensees of member states to
whom it grants a compact privilege to cover the cost of the operations
and activities of the compact commission and its staff, which must, in a
total amount, be sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each
year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate
annual assessment amount for member states shall be allocated based
upon a formula that the compact commission shall promulgate by rule.
4. The compact commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior
to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the compact
commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and
with the authority of the member state.
5. The compact commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts
and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the compact
commission shall be subject to the financial review and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the compact commission shall be sub-
ject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in
and become part of the annual report of the compact commission.
H. Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification:


1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and repre-
sentatives of the compact commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is
made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided
that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such
person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that per-
son. The procurement of insurance of any type by the compact commission
shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The compact commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the compact commission in
any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any ac-
tual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope
of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as
determined by the compact commission that the person against whom the
claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person
from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided fur-
ther, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result
from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The compact commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the com-
pact commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of compact commission employ-
ment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reason-
able basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact commis-
sion employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual
or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional
or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of
any licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise
abrogate a member state's state action immunity or state action affir-
mative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman act,
Clayton act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive
law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the member states or by the compact commission.
SECTION 9
DATA SYSTEM


A. The compact commission shall provide for the development, mainte-
nance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated data system.
B. The compact commission shall assign each applicant for a compact
privilege a unique identifier, as determined by the rules.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all indi-
viduals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules of the
compact commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege to practice
and information related to any such adverse actions;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative program par-
ticipation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation not made confidential
under member state law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure and the reason for such de-
nial;
6. Current significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this
compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of
the compact commission.
D. The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to
this compact or through the data system, when certified by the compact com-
mission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business
records of the compact commission, and shall be entitled to any associated
hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administra-
tive proceedings in a member state.
E. Current significant investigative information pertaining to a li-
censee in any member state will only be available to other member states.
F. It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse
action against a licensee and to monitor the data system to determine whether
any adverse action has been taken against a licensee. Adverse action infor-
mation pertaining to a licensee in any member state will be available to any
other member state.
G. Member states contributing information to the data system may desig-
nate information that may not be shared with the public without the express
permission of the contributing state.
H. Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing
the information shall be removed from the data system.
SECTION 10
RULEMAKING
A. The compact commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and pro-
visions of the compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect
only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid be-
cause the compact commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner


that is beyond the scope and purposes of the compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The rules of the compact commission shall have the force of law in
each member state, provided however that where the rules conflict with the
laws or regulations of a member state that relate to the procedures, actions,
and processes a licensed dietitian is permitted to undertake in that state
and the circumstances under which the licensed dietitian may do so, as held
by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the compact commission
shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
C. The compact commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pur-
suant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted there-
under. Rules shall become binding on the day following adoption or as of the
date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule
or portion of a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same man-
ner used to adopt the compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of
the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member
state.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the compact
commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the compact commission shall
hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments,
data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the compact commission, and
at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the compact com-
mission will hold a public hearing on the proposed rule, the compact commis-
sion shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the compact commission or other publicly accessi-
ble platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the compact commission's no-
tices of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other ways as the compact commission may by rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the com-
pact commission will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the compact
commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or
other means of communication, the mechanism for access to the hearing;
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefore;
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested per-
son; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all writ-
ten comments and documents received by the compact commission in response to
the proposed rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate
hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the compact
commission at hearings required by this section.


K. The compact commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take
final action on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full
text of the rule.
1. The compact commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule pro-
vided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed
rule.
2. The compact commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons
for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The compact commission shall determine a reasonable effective date
for the rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection L. of
this section, the effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than
thirty (30) days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the
rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the compact commission
may consider and adopt an emergency rule with twenty-four (24) hours' no-
tice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking pro-
cedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively
applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than
ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of
this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in
order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of compact commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The compact commission or an authorized committee of the compact
commission may direct revision to a previously adopted rule for purposes of
correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency,
or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revision shall be posted on
the website of the compact commission. The revision shall be subject to
challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The
revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and deliv-
ered to the compact commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no
challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action.
If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the compact commission.
N. No member state's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
compact.
SECTION 11
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight:
1. The executive and judicial branches of state government in each mem-
ber state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement this compact.


2. Except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue is proper and
judicial proceedings by or against the compact commission shall be
brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction
where the principal office of the compact commission is located. The
compact commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute
resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the se-
lection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for
professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
3. The compact commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation
of the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding
for all purposes. Failure to provide the compact commission service of
process shall render a judgment or order void as to the compact commis-
sion, this compact, or promulgated rules.
B. Default, technical assistance, and termination:
1. If the compact commission determines that a member state has de-
faulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this compact or the promulgated rules, the compact commission shall
provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default
shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default,
and any other action that the compact commission may take and shall of-
fer training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The compact commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default
to the other member states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state
may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of
the delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits
conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective
date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending
state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after
all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of in-
tent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the compact commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legis-
lature, the defaulting state's licensing authority, and each of the member
states' licensing authority.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termi-
nation, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of ter-
mination.
F. Upon the termination of a state's membership from this compact, that
state shall immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state
of such termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all
compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of six (6)
months after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The compact commission shall not bear any costs related to a state
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact,
unless agreed upon in writing between the compact commission and the de-
faulting state.


H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the compact commission
by petitioning the United States district court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the compact commission has its principal of-
fices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney's fees.
I. Dispute resolution:
1. Upon request by a member state, the compact commission shall at-
tempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member
states and between member and non-member states.
2. The compact commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement:
1. By supermajority vote, the compact commission may initiate legal
action against a member state in default in the United States district
court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
compact commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with
the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief
sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event ju-
dicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded
all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the com-
pact commission. The compact commission may pursue any other remedies
available under federal or the defaulting member state's law.
2. A member state may initiate legal action against the compact commis-
sion in the United States district court for the District of Columbia or
the federal district where the compact commission has its principal of-
fices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its
promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive re-
lief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, includ-
ing reasonable attorney's fees.
3. No party other than a member state shall enforce this compact against
the compact commission.
SECTION 12
EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact
statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the compact commis-
sion shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven
(7) member states (charter member states) to determine if the statute
enacted by each such charter member state is materially different than
the model compact statute.
a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materi-
ally different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to
the default process set forth in section 11 of this compact.
b. If any member state is later found to be in default, or is termi-
nated, or withdraws from the compact, the compact commission shall


remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if
the number of member states should be less than seven (7).
2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven (7) ini-
tial charter member states shall be subject to the process set forth in
section 8.C.21. to determine if their enactments are materially dif-
ferent from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for par-
ticipation in the compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the compact commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the compact prior
to the effective date of the compact or the compact commission coming
into existence shall be considered to be actions of the compact commis-
sion unless specifically repudiated by the compact commission.
4. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the compact commis-
sion's initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the
rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes
law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the com-
pact commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
the compact becomes law in that state.
B. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing the same.
1. A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred
eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the with-
drawing state's licensing authority to comply with the investigative
and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the
effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a
state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all li-
censees within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to
recognize all compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a
minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such notice of
withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between
a member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with the provi-
sions of this compact.
D. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to
this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until
it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION 13
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This compact and the compact commission's rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the im-
plementation and administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact
expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be
construed to limit the compact commission's rulemaking authority solely for
those purposes.


B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is held by a court of compe-
tent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a
state seeking participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance
is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to
any other government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected
thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B. of this section, the compact commis-
sion may deny a state's participation in the compact or, in accordance with
the requirements of section 11.B., terminate a member state's participation
in the compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a mem-
ber state is a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this com-
pact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member state,
the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member
states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all
severable matters.
SECTION 14
CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other
law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the
conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the compact commission and the
member states are binding in accordance with their terms.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.